New York, session 2025-2026, S8505.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The state finance law is amended by adding a new section 2 53-e to read as follows: 3 § 53-e. Prohibition on line-item appropriations for organizations 4 engaged in political activities. 1. For the purposes of this section, 5 the following terms shall have the following meanings: 6 (a) "Political activity" means any action, communication or expendi- 7 ture which constitutes participation or intervention, directly or indi- 8 rectly, in any political campaign on behalf of or in opposition to any 9 candidate for office, political party, fundraising, or voter registra- 10 tion. 11 (b) "Candidate for public office" means an individual who offers them- 12 self, or is proposed by others, as a contestant for a national, state, 13 or local elective public office, whether such office is to be filled at 14 a primary, general, or special election. An individual shall be deemed 15 to be a candidate for public office for the purposes of this section 16 upon the occurrence of any of the actions specified in subdivision one 17 of section 14-100 of the election law. 18 2. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, it shall be prohibited for 19 any line-item appropriation, grant, or disbursement from a lump sum 20 appropriation pursuant to a resolution or memorandum of understanding to 21 be directed to any organization or entity engaged in political activity. 22 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13695-01-5